Maine, session 132, LD556.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §3015 is enacted to read:
§3015. Heating or energy system
Unless otherwise authorized by statute, a municipality may not adopt any ordinance or
regulation that prohibits the use of a safe and commercially available heating or energy
system of an individual's or entity's choice to serve the individual's or entity's heating or
energy needs, including the heating or energy needs of a motor vehicle, or that prohibits
the individual or entity from engaging the services of a person or energy distributor to
install, connect, service or resupply such a system. As used in this section, "energy
distributor" means an individual or entity allowed to distribute or supply oil, propane,
natural gas or wood or renewable resources or other related energy services to consumers
in the State and "renewable resources" has the same meaning as in Title 35-A, section 3210,
subsection 2, paragraph C.
This section does not limit the authority of a municipality to encourage the use of a
particular type of heating or energy system or to spend funds in support of a particular type
of heating or energy system. This section does not exempt any person or energy distributor
that installs, connects, services or resupplies a heating or energy system from applicable
licensing or other requirements governing such activities.
Page 1 - 132LR1016(02)